






Electrical and Electronics















Reference for Business


Company History Index


		 Electrical and Electronics
	 




ABB Asea Brown Boveri Ltd.


ABB Ltd.


ADC Telecommunications, Inc.


AKG Acoustics GmbH


AMP Incorporated


ATI Technologies Inc.


AU Optronics Corporation


AVX Corporation


Acer Inc.


Acer Incorporated


Acuson Corporation


Adtran Inc.


Advanced Micro Devices, Inc.


Advanced Technology Laboratories, Inc.


Agere Systems Inc.


Agilent Technologies Inc.


Agilysys Inc.


Aiwa Co., Ltd.


Alienware Corporation


Alliant Techsystems Inc.


AlliedSignal Inc.


Alpine Electronics, Inc.


Altera Corporation


Altron Incorporated


American Power Conversion Corporation


American Technical Ceramics Corp.


Amkor Technology, Inc.


Amphenol Corporation


Amstrad plc


Analog Devices, Inc.


Analogic Corporation


Anam Group


Anaren Microwave, Inc.


Andrew Corporation


Anritsu Corporation


Apex Digital, Inc.


Apple Computer, Inc.


Applied Power Inc.


Argon ST, Inc.


Arrow Electronics, Inc.


Ascend Communications, Inc.


Astronics Corporation


Atari Corporation


Atmel Corporation


Audiovox Corporation


Ault Incorporated


Autodesk, Inc.


Avnet Inc.


BMC Industries, Inc.


Ballard Power Systems Inc.


Bang & Olufsen Holding A/S


Barco NV


Bell Microproducts Inc.


Benchmark Electronics, Inc.


Blonder Tongue Laboratories, Inc.


Bogen Communications International, Inc.


Bose Corporation


Boston Acoustics, Inc.


Bowthorpe plc


Braun GmbH


Broadcom Corporation


Bull S.A.


Burr-Brown Corporation


C-COR.net Corp.


CASIO Computer Co., Ltd.


CTS Corporation


Cabletron Systems, Inc.


Cadence Design Systems, Inc.


Cambridge SoundWorks, Inc.


Canon Inc.


Carbone Lorraine S.A.


Carl-Zeiss-Stiftung


Casio Computer Co., Ltd.


Celestica Inc.


Checkpoint Systems, Inc.


Chi Mei Optoelectronics Corporation


Chubb, PLC


Chunghwa Picture Tubes, Ltd.


Cirrus Logic, Inc.


Cisco Systems, Inc.


Citizen Watch Co., Ltd.


Clarion Company Ltd.


Cobham plc


Cobra Electronics Corporation


Coherent, Inc.


Cohu, Inc.


Concurrent Computer Corporation


Conexant Systems, Inc.


Cray Inc.


Cree Inc.


Cubic Corporation


Cypress Semiconductor Corporation


DH Technology, Inc.


DRS Technologies, Inc.


Dai Nippon Printing Co., Ltd.


Daktronics, Inc.


Dallas Semiconductor Corp.


Dallas Semiconductor Corporation


De La Rue plc


Dell Computer Corporation


Dictaphone Healthcare Solutions


Diehl Stiftung & Co. KG


Digi International Inc.


Diodes Incorporated


Discreet Logic Inc.


Dolby Laboratories Inc.


Dynatech Corporation


E-Systems, Inc.


ENCAD, Incorporated


ESS Technology, Inc.


Emerson


Emerson Radio Corp.


Equant N.V.


Equus Computer Systems, Inc.


Everex Systems, Inc.


Exar Corp.


Fisk Corporation


Flextronics International Ltd.


Fluke Corporation


Foxboro Company


Frequency Electronics, Inc.


FuelCell Energy, Inc.


Fuji Electric Co., Ltd.


Fuji Photo Film Co., Ltd.


Fujitsu Limited


Funai Electric Company Ltd.


GPS Industries, Inc.


GenRad, Inc.


General Atomics


General Instrument Corporation


General Signal Corporation


Genesis Microchip Inc.


Goldstar Co., Ltd.


Gould Electronics, Inc.


Grundig AG


Guillemot Corporation


Hadco Corporation


Hamilton Beach/Proctor-Silex Inc.


Harman International Industries Inc.


Harris Corporation


Hayes Corporation


Herley Industries, Inc.


Hewlett-Packard Company


Holophane Corporation


Hon Hai Precision Industry Co., Ltd.


Honeywell Inc.


Hubbell Incorporated


Hughes Supply, Inc.


Hutchinson Technology Incorporated


Hypercom Corporation


IDEO Inc.


IEC Electronics Corp.


Imax Corporation


In Focus Systems, Inc.


Indigo NV


Ingram Micro Inc.


Integrated Defense Technologies, Inc.


Intel Corporation


Intermec Technologies Corporation


International Business Machines Corporation


International Rectifier Corporation


Itel Corporation


JDS Uniphase Corporation


Jabil Circuit, Inc.


Jaco Electronics, Inc.


Johnson Controls, Inc.


Juno Lighting, Inc.


KLA-Tencor Corporation


Katy Industries, Inc.


Keithley Instruments Inc.


Kemet Corp.


Kent Electronics Corporation


Kenwood Corporation


Kimball International, Inc.


Kingston Technology Corporation


Kollmorgen Corporation


Konica Corporation


Koninklijke Philips Electronics N.V.


Kopin Corporation


Koss Corporation


Kudelski Group SA


Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc.


Kyocera Corporation


LSI Logic Corporation


LaBarge Inc.


Lattice Semiconductor Corp.


LeCroy Corporation


Legrand SA


Lenovo Group Ltd.


Lexmark International, Inc.


Linear Technology, Inc.


Littelfuse, Inc.


Lowrance Electronics, Inc.


Lucent Technologies Inc.


Lunar Corporation


MITRE Corporation


Mackie Designs Inc.


MagneTek, Inc.


Marconi plc


Marquette Electronics, Inc.


Maxim Integrated Products, Inc.


McDATA Corporation


Measurement Specialties, Inc.


Medis Technologies Ltd.


Merix Corporation


Methode Electronics, Inc.


Mitel Corporation


Mitsubishi Electric Corporation


Molex Incorporated


Monster Cable Products, Inc.


Motorola, Inc.


N.F. Smith & Associates LP


NEC Corporation


Nam Tai Electronics, Inc.


National Instruments Corporation


National Presto Industries, Inc.


National Semiconductor Corporation


Nexans SA


Nintendo Co., Ltd.


Nokia Corporation


Nortel Networks Corporation


Northrop Grumman Corporation


Oak Technology, Inc.


Omron Corporation


Orbotech Ltd.


Otter Tail Power Company


Palm, Inc.


Palomar Medical Technologies, Inc.


Parlex Corporation


Peavey Electronics Corporation


Philips Electronics N.V.


Philips Electronics North America Corp.


Pioneer Electronic Corporation


Pioneer-Standard Electronics Inc.


Pitney Bowes Inc.


Pixelworks, Inc.


Planar Systems, Inc.


Plexus Corporation


Polk Audio, Inc.


Potter & Brumfield Inc.


Premier Industrial Corporation


Protection One, Inc.


Quanta Computer Inc.


Quanta Services, Inc.


RadioShack Corporation


Radius Inc.


Raytheon Company


Read-Rite Corp.


Reliance Electric Company


Research in Motion Ltd.


Rexel, Inc.


Richardson Electronics, Ltd.


Ricoh Company, Ltd.


Rockford Corporation


S&C Electric Company


SAGEM S.A.


SANYO Electric Co., Ltd.


SCI Systems, Inc.


SEGA Corporation


SGI


SL Industries, Inc.


SPX Corporation


STMicroelectronics NV


SYNNEX Corporation


Sam Ash Music Corporation


Samsung Electronics Co., Ltd.


Sarnoff Corporation


ScanSource, Inc.


Schneider S.A.


Scientific-Atlanta, Inc.


Scitex Corporation Ltd.


Seagate Technology, Inc.


Semitool, Inc.


Semtech Corporation


Sennheiser Electronic GmbH & Co. KG


Sensormatic Electronics Corp.


Sensory Science Corporation


Sharp Corporation


Sheldahl Inc.


Shure Inc.


Siemens A.G.


Siemens AG


Smiths Industries PLC


Solectron Corp.


Solectron Corporation


Sony Corporation


Spansion Inc.


Spectrum Control, Inc.


St. Louis Music, Inc.


Sterling Electronics Corp.


Strix Ltd.


Stuart C. Irby Company


Sun Microsystems, Inc.


Sunbeam-Oster Co., Inc.


SyQuest Technology, Inc.


Synopsys, Inc.


TDK Corporation


TEAC Corporation


THOMSON multimedia S.A.


Tatung Co.


Tech-Sym Corporation


Technitrol, Inc.


Teledyne Technologies Inc.


Telxon Corporation


Teradyne, Inc.


Texas Instruments Inc.


Thales S.A.


The Lamson & Sessions Co.


The Peak Technologies Group, Inc.


The Rival Company


The Titan Corporation


Thomas & Betts Corporation


TomTom N.V.


Tops Appliance City, Inc.


Toromont Industries, Ltd.


Trans-Lux Corporation


TriQuint Semiconductor, Inc.


Trimble Navigation Limited


Tweeter Home Entertainment Group, Inc.


Ultimate Electronics, Inc.


Ultrak Inc.


Universal Electronics Inc.


VIASYS Healthcare, Inc.


VLSI Technology, Inc.


VTech Holdings Ltd.


Varian Associates Inc.


Veeco Instruments Inc.


Viasystems Group, Inc.


Vicon Industries, Inc.


Victor Company of Japan, Limited


Vishay Intertechnology, Inc.


Vitesse Semiconductor Corporation


Vitro Corp.


Wells-Gardner Electronics Corporation


Westinghouse Electric Corporation


Wincor Nixdorf Holding GmbH


Wyle Electronics


Xerox Corporation


Yageo Corporation


York Research Corporation


Zenith Data Systems, Inc.


Zenith Electronics Corporation


Zoom Telephonics, Inc.


Zoran Corporation


Zumtobel AG


Zytec Corporation




















Katy Industries, Inc. - Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Katy Industries, Inc.















Reference for Business


Company History Index


Electrical and Electronics

, 

Manufacturing


Katy Industries, Inc. - Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Katy Industries, Inc.










765 Straits TurnpikeMiddlebury, Connecticut 06762U.S.A.


Company Perspectives:

We strive to increase the top line, reduce costs, closely manage working capital, and control capital expenditures. Successful execution in these areas will benefit not only our shareholders, but our customers as well, as a stronger company can reinvest more readily into constantly improving its customer service and into more innovative product development.
History of Katy Industries, Inc.








Katy Industries, Inc. operates as a manufacturing company with two main business segments: Maintenance Products and Electrical/Electronics. The company manufacturers a wide variety of products including consumer storage, janitorial supplies, scouring pads, electrical cords, surge protectors, and garden lighting. The firm's customer base includes commercial and consumer retail outlets as well as original equipment manufacturers. Katy Industries has facilities in eleven states and three countries.

Early History

Katy Industries was born out of an acquisition of the Missouri-Kansas-Texas railroad (MKT), a financially troubled operation that was in need of a profitable parent company. Wallace Carroll, whose knowledge of railroads dated back to his job as a section hand that helped pay his way through Boston College became acquainted with MKT many years later when he was persuaded that the ailing railroad had some attractive aspects that outweighed its reputation as a money-loser. In particular, Carroll was attracted by its New York Stock Exchange listing and the $30 million tax loss it would provide for his own company, American Gage.
Katy Industries became the parent holding company of MKT because the railroad company purchased 80% of the stock of Carroll's American Gage. With this purchase, Wallace Carroll became the chairman and majority stock owner of Katy Industries, which listed on the New York Stock Exchange in 1968.
Carroll's experience with company acquisitions and expansions began in 1940 when he established a gauge business in Illinois. He had left New England for Chicago in 1963 after he was hired as a salesman for a Rhode Island precision gauge maker. Four years later, he was selling gauges on his own. However, producing the gauges seemed a more profitable business than selling them, and thus Carroll borrowed $6,000 and took on a partner to start his manufacturing business. Carroll did not regret moving into the manufacturing business, but he did regret going into a partnership. "I promised myself I'd operate alone from that moment on," he stated, and he has held to that promise ever since.
Carroll's entry into the gauge manufacturing business was timely. As with most manufacturing companies during World War II, Carroll's American Gage grew rapidly because of an insatiable wartime demand for products such as gauges. By the end of the war, American Gage was doing so well that Carroll was able to begin purchasing other small manufacturing businesses. Carroll wisely made his acquisitions based on a peace-time economy. In particular, one of the companies that he bought after the war was a manufacturer of pots and pans. By 1948, Carroll's holdings had grown large enough that he established American Gage and Machine Company, of which he became sole owner, as a way in which to contain his holdings.
During this time, Carroll's formula for acquiring companies, as a general rule, was to pay cash. He looked for small, family-owned businesses that produced both a good product and a substantial profit. His preference was to keep the original management, but if the management was comprised of older men then his policy was to make them consultants or honorary officers and hire a younger generation to manage the company.
While Carroll was successfully developing American Gage, the MKT railroad was having its share of problems. Several years before the creation of Katy Industries, MKT was on the verge of bankruptcy. The "Katy," as the railroad is nicknamed, included 2700 miles of damaged roadbed from Missouri to Texas on which derailments were likely to occur if the cars were moving faster than 25 miles per hour. Shipment of stock would often he damaged, and very few shippers would allow their products to be transported on the Katy. As a result, by March 1965 only 600 cars were moving on a daily basis.
However, by October 1965, 1000 cars were moving daily. The cause for this substantial increase in activity on the Katy lines was a "non-stop talker" name John Barriger, who came on board to save the railroad from its bankrupt condition. Barriger did not expect that the Katy would ever become a prosperous railroad, but he did hope that he could rebuild it so that a larger railroad company would be enticed into a merger.
Barriger had spent many years around the railroads of the country. After his graduation from MIT in 1921, he worked for the Pennsylvania Railroad and then moved on to Calvin Bullock, Limited, a Wall Street firm where he worked as an industry analyst and inspected the nation's railroads. During World War II, he was associate director of the Office of Defense Transportation. After the war, he headed the Monon railroad, which was almost bankrupt. When he left in 1953, Barriger had managed not only to save the railroad from bankruptcy but also to establish a sound financial basis for its future operations.
In 1965, Barriger was nearing retirement age at the Pittsburg & Lake Erie Railroad company when he heard that the Katy was in need of talented management. Preferring the excitement of his work and the challenge of the Katy over retirement, he took on the job. As the new president of MKT, Barriger relied on his friends to help improve the railroad. By repairing the roadbeds as much as he could within the first few weeks of his presidency, and by making deals with his numerous railroad friends to the effect that their use of the Katy would be returned through payment of back damage claims and improved service, Barriger was able to increase the number of cars moving on the Katy lines within a short period of time.
The return to creditable service on the Katy was a difficult task. The poor condition of the roadbed meant spending any profits on the railroad. Still, its reputation as a money-loser had not prevented Barriger from saving it from bankruptcy, and although his hope that a merger with a larger railroad would take place was not realized, the railroad company looked strong enough for a parent company to give it the kind of support it needed. Barriger continued his presidency only long enough to get the Katy in a strong operating position.

Diversification of Katy in the Late 1960s and 1970s

Katy Industries quickly began to diversify after the acquisition of the MKT. Carroll separated the company into four very different groups: the Electrical Equipment and Products Group; the Industrial Machinery, Equipment, and Products Group; the Consumer Products Group; and the Oil Field and other Services Group. By 1972, the company was expanding into European and Canadian markets, particularly within the oil and gas exploration fields.
One of the most important acquisitions for Katy Industries in the late 1960s was that of Bee Gee Shrimp, a collection of companies that operated a 100-trawler fleet off the coast of Georgetown, Guyana, that harvested and sold shrimp. Bee Gee Shrimp was primarily responsible for doubling the sales and earnings of Katy's Consumer Products Group in 1979, and this allowed Katy a degree of comfort during the recession years.








Even the MKT was showing a profit for the first time since 1963. In 1971, the Katy made a $21,000 profit, which proved its ability to operate on a break-even basis. However, the profits were put back into the railroad, particularly in the area of track maintenance, which was a high 16 percent of operating costs that year.
By 1971, another man with a reputation of being able to tackle tough jobs was at the Katy. Reginald Whitman became president and chairman of MKT in 1969 and is credited with keeping the company headed in a profitable direction. Whitman's confidence that the Katy would not only be profitable but that it would also grow was an important aspect of the future earnings of the company. By 1973, neither the railroad's negative book value of $9 million nor its net deficit was consolidated in Katy's annual report. The company did not have to write off the railroad's losses against its consolidated earnings. In addition, Katy no longer had to carry the railroad's large debt on its balance sheet.
For Katy, the railroad provided a shelter that was important to its acquisitions. Between 1970 and 1973, Katy purchased 15 companies for approximately $34 million. Most of the companies were small and privately owned. Once they were put behind the tax shelter of the railroad, their profits increased significantly.
By this time, Katy was considered to be a diversified investment fund, which was different from others of its kind because it usually owned a majority, if not 100 percent, of its affiliate's stock. W.H. Murphy, Treasurer of Katy, regarded this policy as one which allowed a "uniformity of overall corporate policy as well as the exchange of technology, marketing, purchasing, and financial assistance" within the companies.
Katy's formula for acquiring companies did not change significantly over the years. Carroll continued to purchase small companies that had good product lines and presented small risks. As Carroll stated, "If it is profitable or we could make it profitable, we buy it." It was also Carroll's policy to buy companies that already had good management in order to give the division manager a sizable amount of autonomy. In addition, Katy offered incentives to its subsidiaries, which were based on earning increases as a means of keeping the companies productive and efficient.
This formula was a successful one for Katy. Its net growth increased from $2 million in 1971 to $18 million in 1981. Katy managed to increase sales throughout the recession years of the early 1980s. In fact, its earnings were so good that Katy expanded its pump manufacturing company, LaBour Pump, which was located in Ireland.
In 1983, Katy began to expand into the silverware business. Carroll first purchased Wallace Silversmith Inc. in August and then purchased Insilco Corporation's international unit around October of the same year. These new acquisitions and investments in the early 1980s represented some of Katy's efforts to offset the uneven earnings of the company's railroad and machinery operations.
By 1985, plans were in the air to sell MKT. Union Pacific had made an offer that required MKT to obtain 60 percent of the outstanding income certificates on the company. MKT had only purchased 41 percent by mid-1985. Union Pacific then terminated the offer. Chairman Carroll's comment on this turn of events in early 1986 was that Katy would "keep on running the railroad; it's a good property."
Katy needed to increase its earnings for 1985. The company had some significant losses, which were blamed on the casualty and property insurance business, Midland Insurance. Midland's problems were caused by difficulties in the market. Katy liquidated the insurance company in the early part of 1986, but net sales dropped from $4.3 million in 1984 to $3.9 million in 1985.
In other areas, however, Katy was experiencing new developments. Early in 1985, Katy announced that its subsidiary, Katy-Seghers Incinco Systems Inc., had been awarded its first contract to build a waste-to-energy plant. It had taken the company six years to win a contract since the start of the business in 1979, and the subsidiary was expected to see some profits in 1985. At the time, Carroll saw the waste-to-energy plants as the "future direction" of Katy Industries and expected that there will be great demand, and competition, for these plants because of the increased environmental concerns of the nation. Specifically, state and local governments were considering this form of incineration, and if the trend continued in this area, Katy expected to be in the midst of the development of these plants.

A Transformation Begins: Late 1980s

During the late 1980s and into the 1990s, however, the direction of Katy Industries would change dramatically. Carroll retired, leaving Jacob Saliba as chairman and CEO and William Murphy as president. Under new leadership, Katy began its transformation, which was marked by takeover threats, restructuring, and divestiture.
In 1988, the company finally sold the MKT--which was in financial crisis--to Union Pacific. Katy also divested its seafood business, and by 1990 its main business segments included industrial machinery and components, consumer products, and energy resources. As Katy streamlined its operations, it became attractive as a takeover target. In fact, the Carroll family, which owned approximately 52 percent of the firm in the early 1990s, launched an effort to take the company private. Certain shareholders believed the offer undervalued Katy, and a takeover war began. By 1993, potential suitors included Rosecliff Inc., Pensler Capital Corp., and Steinhardt Enterprises Inc.
During this time, Katy elected a new management team. John Prann was named president while Philip Johnson became chairman. (Saliba was named chairman again in 1997 when Johnson left the firm.) The company also moved headquarters to Englewood, Colorado. In order to maintain its independence, Katy distributed a $14 per share dividend to its shareholders to reduce its available cash and make it less attractive as a target.
The plan worked, and Katy was left to focus on a new restructuring effort that left consumer products, electronics testing equipment, food packaging machinery, and specialty metals as its core business units. The firm continued to sell off unrelated subsidiaries including Panhandle Industrial Co. and also made strategic acquisitions. In 1995, Katy purchased GC Thorsen Inc., a electronic parts distributor. The following year, the firm made a $47 million purchase of Woods Industries Inc., another electronics-related concern.
During 1998 and early 1999, Katy made five acquisitions that included Contico International Inc., a manufacturer of consumer storage, home and automotive products, and janitorial and food service equipment and supplies; specialty abrasives firm Bay State Gritcloth; Wilen Products Inc., a professional cleaning products concern; the consumer electrical division of Noma Industries Ltd.; and Disco Inc., a cleaning products manufacturer catering to the food service industry. By this time, Katy had also divested six companies and its machinery division.

A New Focus for the New Century

As Katy prepared to enter the new century, it adopted yet another focus--maintenance supplies and electrical and electronic products. Revenues jumped from $382 million in 1998 to just under $600 million in 1999 as a result of its aggressive acquisition strategy. In 2000, however, sales fell to $579 million, and the company reported a loss of $5.4 million. Then, in 2001, the firm reported a loss of $63.3 million. That year, the firm took $58.4 million in charges related to restructuring and the write off of certain assets. In addition, sales fell by 12.7 percent in 2001 due to weakening demand and the slowing economy.
As part of the company's cost cutting efforts, it moved headquarters from Colorado to Connecticut and closed an office in Chicago. It also completed a recapitalization with KKTY Holding Company L.L.C. It sold $70 million in stock--700,000 shares--which was mainly used to pay off debt. Saliba retired from his post in 2001 and left C. Michael Jacobi as president and CEO.
In 2002, Jacobi continued to focus on cutting back on expenses, improving profit margins, and new product development. Competition remained fierce, and the recovery of the U.S. economy was crucial to the success of the firm. While Katy had come along way in restructuring itself since the early 1990s, its future held many challenges.

Principal Subsidiaries: American Gage & Machine Company; Contico International, L.L.C.; Contico Manufacturing Limited (U.K.); Contico Manufacturing (Ireland) Limited; CRL Export, Inc. Glit/Disco, Inc.; Hallmark Holdings, Inc.; Duckback Products, Inc.; Primary Coatings, Inc.; GC/Waldom Electronics, Inc.; Katy International, Inc.; Glit/Gemtex, Inc.; Hamilton Precision Metals, Inc.; HPMNC, Inc.; HPM of Pennsylvania, Inc.; Hamilton Metals, L.P.; Wabash Holding Corp.; Wilen Products, Inc.; Katy International, Inc. (British Virgin Islands); Katy Oil Company of Indonesia; Katy-Teweh Petroleum Company; Katy-Seghers, Inc.; Savannah Energy Systems Company Limited Partnership; PTR Machine Corp.; W.J. Smith Wood Preserving Company; Woods Industries, Inc.; Thorsen Tools, Inc.; Woods Industries (Canada), Inc.; Glit/Gemtex, Ltd. (Canada).

Principal Competitors: Ecolab Inc.; The ServiceMaster Company; Unilever.
Chronology


Key Dates:


1948: Wallace Carroll establishes American Gage and Machine Company.

1967: Katy Industries incorporates.

1968: The company goes public.

1972: The firm expands into European and Canadian markets.

1988: The company sells MKT to Union Pacific.

1993: Katy Industries fends off takeover attempts.

1998: Five companies are acquired and six are sold during a restructuring effort.

2001: The company completes a recapitalization.

Additional Details


Public Company


Incorporated: 1967

Employees: 2,922

Sales: $506.0 million (2001)

Stock Exchanges: New York

Ticker Symbol: KT

NAIC: 335931 Current-Carrying Wiring Device Manufacturing; 335999 All Other Miscellaneous Electrical Equipment and Component Manufacturing; 327910 Abrasive Product Manufacturing

Further Reference

Aven, Paula, "Katy Industries Buys Five Supply Companies," Denver Business Journal, February 26, 1999, p. 21B.Beaven, Stephen, "Woods Industries Sold Again," Indianapolis Business Journal, December 16, 1996, p. 4.Berenson, Alex, "Katy Industries Regroups," The Denver Post, July 21, 1994."Katy Industries Completes Sales of Its Seafood Operations," PR Newswire, October 15 1987."Katy Industries to Consider $252 Million Takeover Bid," The New York Times, December 7, 1993, p. D5."Katy Industries to Sell Subsidiary to Okla. Firm," The Denver Post, September 10, 1994."Katy Looking at Buyout," Denver Business Journal, November 10. 2000, p. 7A."Katy Reports Loss," Denver Business Journal, April 6, 2001, p. 6A.Lewis, Al, "Katy Industries Acquires Contico," Denver Rocky Mountain News, January 12, 1999, p. 4B.------, "Katy Industries Decides Not to Sell Electrical, Electronics Business," Denver Rocky Mountain News, December 16, 1999, p. 6B.


User Contributions:


Comment about this article, ask questions, or add new information about this topic:





Name:



E-mail:



Show my email publicly



Type the code shown:








Public Comment: (50-4000 characters)





 Send comment






Katy Industries, Inc. forum




































 



 Katy Industries, Inc. Announces Closing Of Acquisition Of Fort Wayne Plastics 
         










    










 






 











 









Katy Industries, Inc. Announces Closing Of Acquisition Of Fort Wayne Plastics

Feb 25, 2014, 15:24 ET
		  		  					
						 from   Katy Industries, Inc. 











 
















































 

 




















 


BRIDGETON, Mo., Feb. 25, 2014 /PRNewswire/ -- Katy Industries, Inc. (OTC BB: KATY) today announced that it has completed its acquisition of Fort Wayne Plastics, Inc. effective February 19th, 2014. 
Fort Wayne Plastics is a leading manufacturer of medium- to large- sized molded plastic components, specializing in low pressure, multi-nozzle structural plastic and gas assist solutions. "Fort Wayne Plastics' premier manufacturing capabilities and dedication to customer service are highly complementary with our company," commented David J. Feldman, Katy's President and Chief Executive Officer.  "We expect the combination to make each of our companies stronger and benefit each company's customers, suppliers and employees." 
"For Ft. Wayne Plastics, this is an excellent opportunity to expand our customer offering and presence in the marketplace," stated Robb Robertson, President of Fort Wayne Plastics. Mr. Robertson will continue in his role reporting to David Feldman.
Katy Industries, Inc. is a diversified corporation focused on the manufacture, import and distribution of commercial cleaning products and consumer home products.
This press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  Forward-looking statements include all statements of Katy's plans, beliefs or expectations with respect to future events or developments and often may be identified by such words or phrases as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "may," "should," "will," "continue," "is subject to," "opportunity" or similar expressions.  These forward-looking statements are based on the opinions and beliefs of Katy's management, as well as assumptions made by, and information currently available to, Katy's management.  Additionally, the forward-looking statements are based on Katy's current expectations and projections about future events and trends affecting the financial condition of its business.  The forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may lead to results that differ materially from those expressed in any forward-looking statement made by Katy or on its behalf.  These risks and uncertainties include, without limitation, conditions in the general economy and in the markets served by Katy, including changes in the demand for its products; success of any restructuring or cost control efforts; an increase in interest rates; competitive factors, such as price pressures and the potential emergence of rival technologies; interruptions of suppliers' operations or other causes affecting availability of component materials or finished goods at reasonable prices; changes in product mix, costs and yields; labor issues at Katy's facilities or those of its suppliers; legal claims or other regulator actions; and other risks identified from time to time in Katy's filings with the SEC, including its Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012. Katy undertakes no obligation to revise or update such statements to reflect current events or circumstances after the date hereof or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
Company contact:Katy Industries, Inc.James W. Shaffer(314) 656-4321
 SOURCE  Katy Industries, Inc.  




  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Mar 31, 2014, 16:32 ET
Preview: Katy Industries, Inc. Reports 2013 Fourth Quarter Results













Nov 12, 2013, 15:21 ET
Preview: Katy Industries, Inc. Reports Net Income In 2013 Third Quarter Results






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.




 Read More





May 14, 2017, 18:55 ET
Katy Industries, Inc. Enters into Asset Purchase Agreement for...






 More news releases in:

  OTC, SmallCap
Acquisitions, Mergers and Takeovers












Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 




















 



 Katy Industries, Inc. Enters into Asset Purchase Agreement for the Sale of Substantially All of Its 
         










    










 













 











 



















Katy Industries, Inc. Enters into Asset Purchase Agreement for the Sale of Substantially All of Its Operations and Assets to Create a Sustainable Financial Structure
        																																												
              

          Files Voluntary Chapter 11 Petitions to Facilitate Sale with a Commitment for $7.5 million in DIP Financing to Support Operations
        











 News provided by
Katy Industries, Inc.  
May 14, 2017, 18:55 ET









 Share this article




























































ST. LOUIS, May 14, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Katy Industries, Inc.  (OTC:KATY) a leading manufacturer, importer and distributor of commercial cleaning and consumer storage products, announced that it has reached an agreement with a newly-created entity co-owned by Highview Capital, LLC and affiliates of Victory Park Capital Advisors, pursuant to which it would sell substantially all of its assets for a combined cash and credit bid offer.  This agreement would provide long-term financial stability and supply Katy with the financial resources necessary to sustain its ongoing operations and continue to implement its business strategies.








To achieve these financial objectives and facilitate the sale, Katy and certain of its subsidiaries have filed voluntary petitions for reorganization under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code in the U.S. Bankruptcy Court for the District of Delaware.
Pursuant to Section 363 of the Bankruptcy Code, Katy also will be filing a motion for the implementation of bidding procedures to allow other companies the opportunity to submit bids through a Court-supervised process to purchase the assets being sold.  The Company anticipates the sale transaction, which is subject to customary closing conditions, will be completed within 60 to 90 days. Lincoln International LLC is being retained to conduct a sale process under the bid procedures, pursuant to which Lincoln will seek higher or better offers from prospective bidders interested in purchasing the business as a whole or any of its component parts.
"We believe this transaction is in the best interests of our customers, employees, creditors and stakeholders," said Robert Guerra, Katy President and Chief Executive Officer. "Our goal is to put the Company on the proper financial footing, de-lever our balance sheet and use the influx of new funding to recover the business and position our operations for future growth while, at the same time, providing a mechanism to address the liquidity constraints and legacy liabilities that have impacted our ability to operate efficiently and effectively.  By utilizing the Chapter 11 process, we are able to ensure an expedited and orderly sale transaction."
Mr. Guerra noted that the Chapter 11 case and sale process should have no material impact on the Company's ability to fulfill its obligations to its customers and employees.  "During the sale process, we will continue to provide our customers with the on-time delivery of goods and services they demand.  Our daily operations will continue as usual, our vendors will be paid for all supplies furnished and services rendered subsequent to the filing, and all day-to-day aspects of the business will continue without interruption.  Taking care of customers is and will remain our number one priority."  The Company has also filed motions that, once approved by the Bankruptcy Court, will allow the Company to continue paying employee wages, medical benefits and other programs without interruption.  These motions are typical of the Chapter 11 process and are generally heard in the first days of the case.
In addition to the availability of cash collateral under its current first lien facility, Katy also announced it has received a commitment for up to $7.5 million in debtor-in-possession (DIP) financing from the newly-created entity co-owned by Highview Capital, LLC and affiliates of Victory Park Capital Advisors, LLC, subject to court approval.  The DIP financing will be used to maintain uninterrupted service and delivery of products to Katy customers during the completion of the sale transaction, and to ensure payment to vendors for post-petition purchases in the ordinary course.
Katy Industries, Inc. Chapter 11 case has been filed in the U.S. Bankruptcy Court for the District of Delaware in Wilmington under the Case number 17-11101. Additional information can be found at www.jndla.com/cases/Katy.
About Katy Industries, Inc.Katy is a leading manufacturer, importer and distributor of commercial cleaning and consumer storage products. Katy markets its branded products under the Continental Commercial Products, Contico, Wilen and Fundamentals banners. Founded in 1967, Katy is a publicly traded company (OTC: KATY) headquartered in St. Louis and operates injection molding and manufacturing facilities in Jefferson City, Mo.; Fort Wayne, Ind.; and Tiffin, Ohio, with additional distribution centers in Fontana, Calif.; and Toronto. For more information, visit: http://www.katyindustries.com/.
About Victory Park Capital Advisors, LLCVictory Park Capital Advisors, LLC (VPC) is an alternative investment firm with a focus on providing privately negotiated debt and equity capital solutions to small and middle market companies across a wide range of industries. We target fundamentally sound businesses in need of liquidity and/or capital structure transformation and often take a leadership role in the financial restructuring process. VPC's offerings leverage the firm's special situations and credit structuring expertise and differentiated deal origination capabilities. The firm was founded in 2007 and is headquartered in Chicago, with resources in New York, Los Angeles and London. 
VPC is privately held and a Registered Investment Advisor with the SEC. For more information visit: www.victoryparkcapital.com . 
About Highview Capital Highview Capital is an opportunistic private equity investment vehicle headquartered in Los Angeles, CA with approximately $500 million in assets under management. Highview takes a bold approach to creating stable, long-term value for middle-market businesses across numerous industries that are facing an inflection point, including periods of transformation, turnaround, growth, or expansion. For more information, please visit:  http://highviewcp.com/ .
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/katy-industries-inc-enters-into-asset-purchase-agreement-for-the-sale-of-substantially-all-of-its-operations-and-assets-to-create-a-sustainable-financial-structure-300457262.html
SOURCE Katy Industries, Inc.
 Related Links

http://www.katyindustries.com



 













Aug 11, 2014, 16:21 ET
Preview: Katy Industries, Inc. Reports Net Income In 2014 Second Quarter Results






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





 You just read:
Katy Industries, Inc. Enters into Asset Purchase Agreement for the Sale of Substantially All of Its Operations and Assets to Create a Sustainable Financial Structure


 News provided by
Katy Industries, Inc.  
May 14, 2017, 18:55 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 




Consumer Products Company Research Reports


























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance






Finance Services
Banking
Cards
Credit & Loans
Financial Company Reports
Investment
Mortgage
Payment
Other Financial Services


Insurance
General Insurance
Health Insurance
Insurance Company Reports
Life Insurance
Property Insurance
Reinsurance
Auto Insurance


Business Services
Accounting & Tax Services
Advertising
Brokerage
Business Support
Business Services Company Reports
Consulting
Diversified Services Company Reports
Franchise
Wealth Management


Company Reports
Business Survey
Real Estate





Retail






Retail
Cash & Carry
Convenience Stores
Department Stores
Duty Free
Hypermarkets & Supermarkets
Online Retail
Retail Company Reports
Service Station Retail
Specialist Store
Wholesale 

Consumer Goods
Consumer Products Company Reports
Cosmetics & Hygiene Products
Furnishing
Jewelry & Accessories
Household Products
Pet Products
Sporting Goods & Equipment
Stationery
Textile & Leather
Tobacco
Toys & Games 

Food & Beverage
Alcoholic Drinks
Soft Drinks
Food
Food & Beverage Company Reports







Industry






Agriculture
Agribusiness
Agricultural Products
Animal Husbandry
Fisheries
Fertilizers
Gardening & Forestry

Construction
Building Materials
Building Products Company Reports
Commercial Construction
Engineering & Construction Services Company Report
Industrial construction
Infrastructure
Residential Construction


Energy
Alternative Energy
Batteries & Accumulators
Electric Power
Energy Company Reports
Nuclear Power
Smart Grid
Thermal Power

Metallurgy
Alkali Metals
Ferrous Metallurgy
Metal Alloys
Metal products
Metals & Mining Company Reports
Non-Ferrous Metallurgy
Precious Metals
Rare-Earth Metals
Uranous Metals (Actinoid)


Mineral Raw Materials
Building Raw Materials & Fillers
Conglomerates Company Reports
Fossil Fuel
Nonmetallic Minerals
Metalloids
Ores
Precious & Semi-Precious Stones


Machinery & Equipment
Defence & Security
Packaging Industry
Publishing Industry
Pulp & Paper
Vehicle
Other Industries






Chemicals






Organic Chemicals
Alcohols
Alkenes (Olefins)
Ethers
Organic Acids & Derivatives
Aldehydes & Ketones
Amines
Halogenated
Polymers
Alkanes
Benzene & Derivatives
Isocyanates


Inorganic Chemicals
Alkali
Inorganic Salts
Non-Metallic Oxides
Inorganic Acids
Metal Oxides


Chemical Company Reports
Chemical Reports by CAS Number
Composite Materials
Oils & Lubricants






IT & Technology






Consumer Electronics
Audio & Video Equipment
GPS Navigation
Mobile Phones & Smartphones
PC & Notebooks
Photography


Hardware
Computer Hardware
Computers & Electronic Equipment Company Reports
Data Storage
Networking Hardware


Software
Application Software
Operating System
Programming Software
Software Development
Software & Technology Services Company Reports
Video Games


Telecommunications
Broadband
Communication Services Company Reports
Internet
Mobile
Networks
Telecom Equipment
Wireless Technology






Life Sciences






Medical Devices
Anesthesia & Respiratory
Cardiovascular Devices
Dental
Diabetes Care
Diagnostic Equipment
Drug Delivery
Endoscopy
Ear, Nose & Throat (ENT)
Healthcare Equipment/Supplies Company Reports
Implants
Neurology
Orthopedic
Ophthalmic
Surgical Equipment
Wound Closure
Other Medical Devices


Biotechnology
Biomarkers
Biomaterials
Biosimilars
Stem Cell

Diagnostics & Diseases
In Vitro Diagnostics
Incontinence
Cancer
Cardiovascular
Diabetes
Hepatitis


Healthcare
Healthcare Services Company Reports
Ear Care
Eye Care
Hospital
Medicated Skin Care
Therapy
Wound Care


Pharmaceuticals
Clinical Trial
Drug Stores
Drugs
Pharmaceuticals Company Reports
Vaccines

Medical Products
Veterinary






Services






Freight & Trucking
Air Freight
Freight & Trucking Company Reports
Rail Freight
Road Freight
Water Freight


Media & Entertainment
Casino and Gaming
Cinema & Theater
Magazine & Newspaper
Media Company Reports
Music
Social Media
Television & Radio


Food Service
Fast Food
Restaurants
Restaurants & Leisure Company Reports
Pub & Bar


Consumer Services
Education
Hotels
Legal Services
Logistics
Post & Courier
Recruitment
Rent
Sports & Fitness Center
Travel & Leisure
Other Services








About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Consumer Goods

Consumer Products Company Reports








Consumer Products Company Research Reports


Consumer products represent the largest industry on a global scale. Consumer goods sales make up nearly two thirds of the total world trade. Given the similarity of the product choice offered by market players, companies struggle to make their brands well-known and gain customer loyalty. 
The consumer products market have undergone some changes in the XXI century: the supply and distribution channels expanded, international trade conditions were improved, new marketing strategies were worked out. Meanwhile, the demand for consumer products rises, and the competitive landscape becomes increasingly fierce. Products safety and environmental friendliness are the most burning issues nowadays. To hold stable position and respond to the market challenges, companies constantly upgrade their manufacturing techniques, increase capacities, diversify product ranges and seek effective ways to attract new customers.
The research reports within this catalogue highlight the consumer products industry and market dynamics with focus on companies’ performance. The reports provide profiles of various players active in the consumer goods market. Extensive analyses of market strategies developed by consumer products companies, major market drivers and restrains, the market segmentation and opportunities can be found in the research studies. Thorough examinations of the market development trends and common industry products are also offered in the reports.





All Regions


Consumer Products Company Reports


All Publishers BAC Industry Comparative Analysis
                        BAC SWOT Company Reports
                        datamining
                    



                            Found
                                 860 publications                    



ZIL Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
ZIL Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Zegarelli Group International, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Zegarelli Group International, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Z-Trim Holdings, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Z-Trim Holdings, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Youyuan International Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Youyuan International Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Ya-Man Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Ya-Man Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Winning Brands Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Winning Brands Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


We&Win Diversification Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
We&Win Diversification Co.,Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wellstone Filter Sciences, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wellstone Filter Sciences, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Welcron Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Welcron Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Weikang Bio-Technology Group Co., Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Weikang Bio-Technology Group Co., Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


WD-40 Company - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
WD-40 Company - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Wang-Zheng Bhd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Wang-Zheng Bhd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


VST Industries Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
VST Industries Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vitavea, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vitavea, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vitalstate Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vitalstate Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vitality Products Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vitality Products Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vital Living Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vital Living Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vinda International Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vinda International Holdings Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Viking Kagit Ve Seluloz AS - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Viking Kagit Ve Seluloz AS - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Veridien Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Veridien Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vector Group Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vector Group Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Vantone International Group, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Vantone International Group, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


ValueTree Holdings AB - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
ValueTree Holdings AB - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


USANA Health Sciences Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
USANA Health Sciences Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Universal Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Universal Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


United-Guardian Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
United-Guardian Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Unilever Maghreb S.A. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Unilever Maghreb S.A. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Unilever Indonesia tbk PT - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Unilever Indonesia tbk PT - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Unilever Ghana Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Unilever Ghana Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Unihair Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Unihair Company Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Unidus Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Unidus Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Uni-Charm Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Uni-Charm Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Ulric de Varens - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Ulric de Varens - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


TSL Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
TSL Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Treet Corp. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Treet Corp. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Transdermal Cosmetics Plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Transdermal Cosmetics Plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Transaction, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Transaction, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Total Nutraceutical Solutions - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Total Nutraceutical Solutions - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Titanium Holdings Group Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Titanium Holdings Group Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Tiens Biotech Group USA Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Tiens Biotech Group USA Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Tidehold Development Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Tidehold Development Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


The National Detergent Company S.A.O.G. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
The National Detergent Company S.A.O.G. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Thantawan Industry Public Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Thantawan Industry Public Co. Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Tensall Biotech Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Tensall Biotech Co., Ltd. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Tasker Products Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Tasker Products Corp. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Takaso Resources Bhd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Takaso Resources Bhd - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Synutra International Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Synutra International Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Sweet Success Enterprises, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Sweet Success Enterprises, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Swedish Match AB - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Swedish Match AB - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages


Swallowfield plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis
US$ 200.00
Swallowfield plc - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results. Jun, 2017 30 pages




1
2
3
4
5
>

Skip to top





Market Reports


All Categories  Consumer Products Company Reports Cosmetics & Hygiene Products Cosmetics Hygiene Products  Furnishing Home Furnishings Interior Design Office Furniture  Jewelry & Accessories Household Products Appliances Homeware  Pet Products Sporting Goods & Equipment Stationery Textile & Leather Apparel Clothing, Textiles & Accessories Company Reports Fibers & Tissues Footwear Leather Goods  Tobacco Toys & Games 






Need Help?

								+44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
				+1 732 587 5005 (USA)
info@marketpublishers.com







Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:























Katy Industries, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis



























Sales and support:
        +44 20 8123 2220 (UK)
        +1 732 587 5005 (US)
info@marketpublishers.com





Business & Finance

Retail






Retail
Cash & Carry
Convenience Stores
Department Stores
Duty Free
Hypermarkets & Supermarkets
Online Retail
Retail Company Reports
Service Station Retail
Specialist Store
Wholesale 

Consumer Goods
Consumer Products Company Reports
Cosmetics & Hygiene Products
Furnishing
Jewelry & Accessories
Household Products
Pet Products
Sporting Goods & Equipment
Stationery
Textile & Leather
Tobacco
Toys & Games 

Food & Beverage
Alcoholic Drinks
Soft Drinks
Food
Food & Beverage Company Reports







Industry

Chemicals

IT & Technology

Life Sciences

Services



About
Faq
 My Cart


 











Market Reports
Press-Releases
Events
About Us
Terms & Conditions
Customer FAQ




Market Research Reports

Consumer Goods

Consumer Products Company Reports





Katy Industries, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis





Date:
June 15, 2017



Pages:
30


Price:




US$ 200.00




License             [?]:


Single User - US$ 200.00
Corporate License - US$ 400.00




Publisher:
datamining


Report type:
Strategic Report


Delivery:

E-mail Delivery (PDF)


ID:
KB28CC00BCEB1EN



        Leaflet:
    

Download PDF Leaflet






















Abstracts
Contents
List of Tables
List of Figures





Katy Industries, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis provides access to trustworthy data on the company and its performance, presenting an all-around view. It offers an insightful overview of the company’s structure and recent operations, includes SWOT analysis, highlights product and service offerings, covers the latest important corporate actions and financial results.

Scope

Business Description – A detailed description of the company’s principal activities.
Locations, Subsidiaries, Associated Companies – A list of key locations, subsidiaries and associated companies of Katy Industries, Inc. with contact details.
Milestones and History – An overview of the major events associated with the company.
Key Employee Information – A list of Katy Industries, Inc. key executives and their brief biographies.
Major Products and Services – A list of major products, services and brands of the company.
SWOT Analysis – An in-depth analysis of the company’s Strengths, Weakness, Opportunities and Threats.
Financial Analysis - Updated info on income statement, balance sheet and cash flows key figures; main financial ratios and capital market snapshot.
Key Competitors – A list of key Katy Industries, Inc. competitors.
Latest News – Company related news bulletins.



1 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - OVERVIEW

1.1 Katy Industries, Inc. - Business Description
1.2 Katy Industries, Inc. - Locations, Subsidiaries, Associated Companies
1.3 Katy Industries, Inc. - Milestones and History

2 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - KEY EMPLOYEE INFORMATION

3 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - OWNERSHIP AND MAJOR HOLDERS

4 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - MAJOR PRODUCTS AND SERVICES

5 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - SWOT ANALYSIS

5.1 Katy Industries, Inc. - Strengths
5.2 Katy Industries, Inc. - Weaknesses
5.3 Katy Industries, Inc. - Opportunities
5.4 Katy Industries, Inc. - Threats

6 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. – FINANCIAL ANALYSIS

6.1 Katy Industries, Inc. - Financial Snapshot
6.2 Katy Industries, Inc. – Stock Market Snapshot

7 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - KEY COMPETITORS

8 KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. - LATEST NEWS 

APPENDIX

About datamining
Sources and Methodology
Ratio Definitions
Disclaimer

You will receive the report in 24 hours after the purchase as it takes one business day to update it so you can get the most recent data available.



LIST OF TABLES

Table 1: Katy Industries, Inc. Key Facts 
Table 2: Katy Industries, Inc. Offices and Representations 
Table 3: Katy Industries, Inc. Milestones and History 
Table 4: Katy Industries, Inc. Key Executives 
Table 5: Katy Industries, Inc. Key Executives Biographies 
Table 6: Katy Industries, Inc. Major Shareholders 
Table 7: Katy Industries, Inc. Products and Services
Table 8: Katy Industries, Inc. SWOT Analysis
Table 9: Katy Industries, Inc. Profitability 
Table 10: Katy Industries, Inc. Management Effectiveness
Table 11: Katy Industries, Inc. Income Statement Key Figures 
Table 12: Katy Industries, Inc. Balance Sheet Key Figures 
Table 13: Katy Industries, Inc. Cash Flow Key Figures 
Table 14: Katy Industries, Inc. Capital Market Snapshot 



LIST OF FIGURES

Figure 1: Katy Industries, Inc. Operating Margin Chart 
Figure 2: Katy Industries, Inc. Profit Margin Chart 
Figure 3: Katy Industries, Inc. Return on Assets (ROA) Chart
Figure 4: Katy Industries, Inc. Return on Equity (ROE) Chart 
Figure 5: Katy Industries, Inc. Debt to Equity Chart 
Figure 6: Katy Industries, Inc. Current Ratio Chart 
Figure 7: Katy Industries, Inc. 1-year Stock Chart 
Figure 8: Katy Industries, Inc. 5-year Stock Chart
        
        
Skip to top




MORE PUBLICATIONS


Katy Industries, Inc. Fundamental Company Report Including Financial, SWOT, Competitors and Industry Analysis
US$ 499.00
Aug, 2017 · 50 pages


WSI Industries, Inc.: Aerospace and Defense - Company Profile, SWOT and Financial Analysis
US$ 125.00
Jan, 2016 · 35 pages


Cavco Industries, Inc. (CVCO): Company Profile and SWOT Analysis
US$ 125.00
Sep, 2016 · 34 pages


Lapolla Industries, Inc. (LPAD) - Company Capsule
US$ 75.00
Jun, 2015 · 25 pages


Webco Industries Inc. (WEBC) - Company Capsule
US$ 99.00
Oct, 2016 · 28 pages








Ask Your Question
Katy Industries, Inc. - Business Profile with Financial and SWOT Analysis







Company name*:



Contact person*:



Phone/fax*:



Email*:




 Request invoice


Your enquiry:




				Please click on a Check Box below to confirm you are not a robot:
					


























Market Reports


All Categories  Consumer Products Company Reports Cosmetics & Hygiene Products Cosmetics Hygiene Products  Furnishing Home Furnishings Interior Design Office Furniture  Jewelry & Accessories Household Products Appliances Homeware  Pet Products Sporting Goods & Equipment Stationery Textile & Leather Apparel Clothing, Textiles & Accessories Company Reports Fibers & Tissues Footwear Leather Goods  Tobacco Toys & Games 












Sales and support:
                    +44 20 8123 2220
            +1 732 587 5005
info@marketpublishers.com
  © 2006-2016 MarketPublishers.com


About Us
Our Clients
Our Publishers
Customer FAQ


Market Reports
New Publications
Reports by Regions
Press-Releases


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Return Policy
Affiliate Program


Join as Publisher

Follow Us:













































KATY INDUSTRIES INC (KATY) 10-K and 10-Q SEC Filings :: Last10K.com























		 
	




KATY INDUSTRIES INC (KATY) SEC Filing 10-K Annual report for the fiscal year ending Thursday, December 31, 2015














last10k.com/sec-filings/katy/0001140361-16-059556.htm



Earnings Release
10-K Annual Report
10-K Exhibits
10-K Statistics







Exhibit 99.1
 
KATY NEWS
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE


KATY INDUSTRIES, INC.
REPORTS 2015 FOURTH QUARTER RESULTS





-
Net sales increased 14% over prior year






-
Completed relocation of the Bridgeton, Missouri manufacturing facility to Jefferson City, Missouri






-
Continued to integrate Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility





St. Louis, MO – March 30, 2016 – Katy Industries, Inc. (OTC BB: KATY), a leading manufacturer, importer and distributor of commercial cleaning and consumer storage products, as well as a contract manufacturer of structural foam products, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2015.


“We are pleased to have successfully completed the relocation of the Bridgeton, Missouri manufacturing facility to Jefferson City, Missouri,” said David J. Feldman, Katy Chief Executive Officer. “With the physical move fully complete, we are focusing on realizing manufacturing productivity improvements in our new facility. In addition, we continue to advance our integration of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility. We believe the acquisition will help drive significant improvement in both sales and profitability in the coming years.”


Mr. Feldman also stated, “We continue to have strong gains in operating income, excluding one-time costs associated with the aforementioned relocation and acquisition costs, driven by our ongoing strategic initiatives to improve gross margins. We look forward to strong 2016 results driven by strong demand for our products and by capturing the benefits of the relocation and integration of our manufacturing facilities.”


Year-to-Date Financial Results


Financial highlights for the year ended December 31, 2015 as compared to the year ended December 31, 2014, included:






·
Net sales for the year ended December 31, 2015 were $114.0 million, an increase of $14.3 million, or 14.3%, compared to the same period in 2014. The increase was a result of the Tiffin, Ohio business acquisition, which contributed $19.0 million in net sales for the year ended December 31, 2015, partially offset by decreased sales of $2.7 million at our Fort Wayne manufacturing facility and $2.3 million  at our Jefferson City, Missouri facility due to the transition of those operations from Bridgeton, Missouri in the fourth quarter of 2015. Gross margin was 13.7% for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of 140 basis points from the same period a year ago.  The decrease was primarily a result of increased rent expense incurred due to operating at both our Bridgeton, Missouri and Jefferson City, Missouri facilities during our relocation for the year ended December 31, 2015 as compared to the year ended December 31, 2014.









·
Severance, restructuring and related charges of $5.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, were for the relocation of our Bridgeton, Missouri facility to Jefferson City, Missouri.



 









·
Operating loss was $4.1 million, or 3.6% of net sales during the year ended December 31, 2015, compared to operating income of $1.1 million, or 1.1% of net sales, for the same period in 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation and the acquisition costs of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, operating income was $3.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2015 versus an operating income of $1.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.









·
Interest expense increased by $3.0 million during the year ended December 31, 2015 as compared to the year ended December 31, 2014 as a result of the increased borrowings under the First and Second Lien Credit Agreements during the period.









·
The income tax benefit for the year ended December 31, 2014 includes a benefit as a result of the acquisition of Fort Wayne Holdings, Inc. The Company recorded deferred tax liabilities of $2.4 million which reduced its net deferred tax assets. The reduction in deferred tax assets caused a release of a valuation allowance of $2.3 million.









·
The Company reported a net loss for the year ended December 31, 2015 of $8.0 million, or $1.00 per basic and diluted share, versus net income of $2.5 million, or $0.31 per basic share ($0.09 per diluted share), for the year ended December 31, 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation, acquisition costs included in selling, general and administrative expenses in 2015 and the one-time tax benefit and acquisition costs in 2014, net income was $0.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2015 versus net income of $0.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.





Fourth Quarter Financial Results


Financial highlights for the fourth quarter of 2015, as compared to the same period in the prior year, included:






·

Net sales in the fourth quarter of 2015 were $30.3 million, an increase of $2.7 million, or 9.7%, compared to the same period in 2014. The increase was a result of the Tiffin, Ohio business acquisition, partially offset by reduced sales at our Jefferson City, Missouri facility due to the transition of those operations from Bridgeton, Missouri in the fourth quarter of 2015 . Gross margin was 8.0% for the three months ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of 280 basis points from the same period a year ago.  The decrease was primarily a result of increased rent expense incurred due to operating both our Bridgeton, Missouri and Jefferson City, Missouri facilities during our relocation and slightly lower margins on sales due to product mix for the three months ended December 31, 2015 as compared to the three months ended December 31, 2014.










·
Severance, restructuring and related charges were $1.7 million for the three months ended December 31, 2015 for costs associated with the relocation of our Bridgeton, Missouri manufacturing facility to Jefferson City, Missouri.









·
Operating loss was $2.3 million, or 7.5% of net sales, in the fourth quarter of 2015, compared to $0.4 million, or 1.3% of net sales, for the same period in 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation, operating loss was $0.5 million and $0.4 million for the three months ended December 31, 2015 and 2014, respectively.









·
Interest expense increased by $1.1 million during the fourth quarter as a result of the increased borrowings under the First and Second Lien Credit Agreements during the period.









·
Net loss in the fourth quarter of 2015 was $3.5 million, or $0.45 per basic and diluted share, versus net loss of $0.6 million, or $0.07 per basic and diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2014. With the exclusion of the one-time items related to our facility relocation, net loss was $1.7 million for the three months ended December 31, 2015 versus net loss of $0.6 million for the three months ended December 31, 2014.



 





Liquidity and Capital Resources


Cash used in operating activities before changes in operating assets and liabilities was $0.8 million in the year ended December 31, 2015 as compared to cash provided of $2.7 million in the same period of 2014. Changes in operating assets and liabilities from continuing operations provided $5.2 million in the year ended December 31, 2015 as compared to using $6.0 million in the same period of 2014. The decrease in usage is primarily attributable to an increase in accounts payables and other liabilities, partially offset by a decrease in accrued expenses and an increase in other assets as compared to 2014, as well as less usage related to inventory and accounts receivable as compared to 2014.


Cash flows used by investing activities of $27.3 million in the year ended December 31, 2015 were primarily due to the purchase of our Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility and capital expenditures related to the relocation of the Bridgeton, Missouri facility to Jefferson City, Missouri.


Debt at December 31, 2015 was $48.7 million, versus $22.0 million at December 31, 2014. On April 7, 2015, in conjunction with the acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, the Company amended the BMO Credit Agreement resulting in an increase of $6.0 million to the revolving credit facility and entered into a Second Lien Credit and Security Agreement with Victory Park Management, LLC which provided the company with a $24.0 million term loan.


Non-GAAP Financial Measures


This press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  Forward-looking statements include all statements of the Company’s plans, beliefs or expectations with respect to future events or developments and often may be identified by such words or phrases as “anticipates,” “believes,” “estimates,” “expects,” “intends,” “plans,” “projects,” “may,” “should,” “will,” “continue,” “is subject to,” or similar expressions.  These forward-looking statements are based on the opinions and beliefs of Katy’s management, as well as assumptions made by, and information currently available to, the Company’s management.  Additionally, the forward-looking statements are based on Katy’s current expectations and projections about future events and trends affecting the financial condition of its business.  The forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may lead to results that differ materially from those expressed in any forward-looking statement made by the Company or on its behalf.  These risks and uncertainties include, without limitation, conditions in the general economy and in the markets served by the Company, including changes in the demand for its products; success of any restructuring or cost control efforts; an increase in interest rates; competitive factors, such as price pressures and the potential emergence of rival technologies; interruptions of suppliers’ operations or other causes affecting availability of component materials or finished goods at reasonable prices; changes in product mix, costs and yields; labor issues at the Company’s facilities or those of its suppliers; legal claims or other regulatory actions; and other risks identified from time to time in the Company’s filings with the SEC, including its Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015. Katy undertakes no obligation to revise or update such statements to reflect current events or circumstances after the date hereof or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


Katy Industries, Inc. is a diversified corporation focused on the manufacture, import and distribution of commercial cleaning products, consumer home products and a contract manufacturer of structural foam products.


Company contact:
Katy Industries, Inc.
Curt Kroll
(314) 656-4381
 





KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. SUMMARY OF OPERATIONS AND
COMPREHENSIVE (LOSS) INCOME - UNAUDITED
(In thousands, except per share data)




 
 

Three Months Ended

 
 

Twelve Months Ended

 


 
 

December 31,
2015

 
 

December 31,
2014

 
 

December 31,
2015

 
 

December 31,
2014

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Net sales

 

$


30,255

 
 

$


27,580

 
 

$


113,957

 
 

$


99,657

 



Cost of goods sold

 
 

27,831

 
 
 

24,585

 
 
 

98,361

 
 
 

84,605

 



Gross profit

 
 

2,424

 
 
 

2,995

 
 
 

15,596

 
 
 

15,052

 



Selling, general and administrative expenses

 
 

3,001

 
 
 

3,357

 
 
 

14,145

 
 
 

13,990

 



Severance, restructuring and related charges

 
 

1,679

 
 
 

-

 
 
 

5,593

 
 
 

-

 



Operating (loss) income

 
 

(2,256


)

 
 

(362


)

 
 

(4,142


)

 
 

1,062

 



Interest expense

 
 

(1,314


)

 
 

(225


)

 
 

(4,047


)

 
 

(1,011


)




Other, net

 
 

39

 
 
 

38

 
 
 

139

 
 
 

155

 



(Loss) income before income tax (expense) benefit

 
 

(3,531


)

 
 

(549


)

 
 

(8,050


)

 
 

206

 



Income tax (expense) benefit

 
 

(8


)

 
 

(24


)

 
 

90

 
 
 

2,279

 



Net (loss) income

 

$


(3,539


)

 

$


(573


)

 

$


(7,960


)

 

$


2,485

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Other comprehensive (loss) income

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Foreign currency translation

 
 

(75


)

 
 

(55


)

 
 

(253


)

 
 

(130


)




Pension and other postretirement benefits

 
 

166

 
 
 

(566


)

 
 

166

 
 
 

(566


)




Total other comprehensive income (loss)

 
 

91

 
 
 

(621


)

 
 

(87


)

 
 

(696


)




Total comprehensive (loss) income

 

$


(3,448


)

 

$


(1,194


)

 

$


(8,047


)

 

$


1,789

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



(Loss) earnings per share of common stock - Basic

 

$


(0.45


)

 

$


(0.07


)

 

$


(1.00


)

 

$


0.31

 



(Loss) earnings per share of common stock - Diluted

 

$


(0.45


)

 

$


(0.07


)

 

$


(1.00


)

 

$


0.09

 


 





KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. BALANCE SHEETS – UNAUDITED
(In thousands)




 
 

December 31,
2015

 
 

December 31,
2014

 



ASSETS

 
 
 
 
 
 



CURRENT ASSETS:

 
 
 
 
 
 



Cash

 

$


53

 
 

$


66

 



Accounts receivable, net of allowances of $27 and $183

 
 

12,211

 
 
 

10,840

 



Inventories, net

 
 

19,267

 
 
 

15,881

 



Other current assets

 
 

2,164

 
 
 

659

 



Total current assets

 
 

33,695

 
 
 

27,446

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



OTHER ASSETS:

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Goodwill

 
 

8,377

 
 
 

2,556

 



Intangibles, net

 
 

20,877

 
 
 

3,909

 



Other

 
 

3,882

 
 
 

1,839

 



Total other assets

 
 

33,136

 
 
 

8,304

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Property and Equipment

 
 

51,421

 
 
 

59,421

 



Less - Accumulated depreciation

 
 

(36,646


)

 
 

(49,263


)




Property and equipment, net

 
 

14,775

 
 
 

10,158

 



Total assets

 

$


81,606

 
 

$


45,908

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIT

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



CURRENT LIABILITIES:

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Accounts payable

 

$


20,440

 
 

$


7,327

 



Book overdraft

 
 

918

 
 
 

699

 



Accrued compensation

 
 

1,149

 
 
 

1,457

 



Accrued expenses

 
 

7,142

 
 
 

7,093

 



Payable to related party

 
 

-

 
 
 

3,650

 



Deferred revenue

 
 

130

 
 
 

186

 



Current maturities of long term debt

 
 

1,800

 
 
 

-

 



Revolving credit agreement

 
 

23,969

 
 
 

21,967

 



Total current liabilities

 
 

55,548

 
 
 

42,379

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



DEFERRED REVENUE

 
 

-

 
 
 

130

 



PAYABLE TO RELATED PARTY

 
 

4,268

 
 
 

-

 



LONG TERM DEBT

 
 

22,913

 
 
 

-

 



OTHER LIABILITIES

 
 

7,615

 
 
 

4,090

 



Total liabilities

 
 

90,344

 
 
 

46,599

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



STOCKHOLDERS’ DEFICIT

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



15% Convertible preferred stock

 
 

108,256

 
 
 

108,256

 



Common stock

 
 

9,822

 
 
 

9,822

 



Additional paid-in capital

 
 

27,110

 
 
 

27,110

 



Accumulated other comprehensive loss

 
 

(1,631


)

 
 

(1,544


)




Accumulated deficit

 
 

(130,858


)

 
 

(122,898


)




Treasury stock

 
 

(21,437


)

 
 

(21,437


)




Total stockholders' deficit

 
 

(8,738


)

 
 

(691


)




Total liabilities and stockholders' deficit

 

$


81,606

 
 

$


45,908

 


 





KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS – UNAUDITED
(In thousands)




 
 

Twelve Months Ended

 


 
 

December 31,
2015

 
 

December 31,
2014

 



Cash flows from operating activities:

 
 
 
 
 
 



Net (loss) income

 

$


(7,960


)

 

$


2,485

 



Depreciation

 
 

2,986

 
 
 

1,996

 



Amortization of intangible assets

 
 

820

 
 
 

157

 



Amortization of debt issuance costs

 
 

658

 
 
 

326

 



Stock-based compensation

 
 

(15


)

 
 

27

 



Payment In Kind interest expense

 
 

831

 
 
 

-

 



Loss on disposal of assets

 
 

207

 
 
 

-

 



Tenant improvement allowances

 
 

2,411

 
 
 

-

 



Deferred income taxes

 
 

(110

)
 
 

(2,317


)




Other

 
 

(623


)

 
 

-

 


 
 
 

(795


)

 
 

2,674

 



Changes in operating assets and liabilities:

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Accounts receivable

 
 

(579


)

 
 

(2,099


)




Inventories

 
 

(1,909


)

 
 

(4,450


)




Other assets

 
 

(1,245


)

 
 

56

 



Accounts payable

 
 

9,393

 
 
 

733

 



Accrued expenses

 
 

(621


)

 
 

(246


)




Payable to related party

 
 

500

 
 
 

500

 



Deferred revenue

 
 

(186


)

 
 

(187


)




Other liabilities

 
 

(136

)
 
 

(308


)



 
 
 

5,217

 
 
 

(6,001


)




Net cash provided by (used in) continuing operations

 
 

4,422

 
 
 

(3,327


)




Net cash provided by discontinued operations

 
 

-

 
 
 

74

 



Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities

 
 

4,422

 
 
 

(3,253


)



 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Cash flows from investing activities:

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Payment for acquisition, net of cash received

 
 

(23,855


)

 
 

(10,775


)




Proceeds from sale of assets

 
 

474

 
 
 

-

 



Capital expenditures

 
 

(3,893


)

 
 

(831


)




Net cash used in investing activities

 
 

(27,274


)

 
 

(11,606


)



 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Cash flows from financing activities:

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Net borrowings on revolving credit facility

 
 

2,002

 
 
 

14,261

 



Proceeds from term loan facility

 
 

24,000

 
 
 

-

 



Loan from related party

 
 

-

 
 
 

400

 



(Decrease) increase in book overdraft

 
 

(123


)

 
 

435

 



Direct costs associated with debt facilities

 
 

(2,627


)

 
 

(672


)




Net cash provided by financing activities

 
 

23,252

 
 
 

14,424

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Effect of exchange rate changes on cash

 
 

(413


)

 
 

(207


)



 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Net decrease in cash

 
 

(13


)

 
 

(642


)




Cash, beginning of period

 
 

66

 
 
 

708

 



Cash, end of period

 

$


53

 
 

$


66

 


 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Supplemental cash flows disclosure

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Interest paid

 

$


2,504

 
 

$


657

 



Income taxes paid

 

$


30

 
 

$


31

 



Supplemental information of non-cash investing and financing activity

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 



Accrued contingent earnout payment

 

$


2,000

 
 

$


-

 



Capital expenditures included in accounts payable and book overdrafts

 

$


1,904

 
 

$


-

 



Asset retirement obligation included in other liabilities

 

$


190

 
 

$


-

 


 
 





                                The following information was filed by KATY INDUSTRIES INC on Wednesday, March 30, 2016 as an 8K 2.02 statement, which is a press release pertaining to results of operations and financial condition. It may be helpful to assess the quality of management by comparing the information in the press release to the information in the accompanying 10-K Annual Report statement of earnings and operation as management may choose to highlight particular information in the press release.
                            






Click to view a specific section in this 10-K Report
View entire 10-K Report
Consolidated Balance Sheets
Consolidated Balance Sheets (parenthetical)
Consolidated Statements Of Operations And Comprehensive (loss) Income
Consolidated Statements Of Stockholders' (deficit) Equity
Consolidated Statements Of Cash Flows
Organization Of The Business
Significant Accounting Policies
(loss) Earnings Per Share
Long-term Debt
Retirement Benefit Plans
Stockholders' Equity
Stock Incentive Plans
Income Taxes
Related Party Transactions
Lease Obligations
Geographic Information
Commitments And Contingencies
Business Acquisitions
Severance, Restructuring And Related Charges
Intangible Assets
Supplemental Balance Sheet Information
Significant Accounting Policies (policies)
Significant Accounting Policies (tables)
(loss) Earnings Per Share (tables)
Long-term Debt (tables)
Retirement Benefit Plans (tables)
Stock Incentive Plans (tables)
Income Taxes (tables)
Lease Obligations (tables)
Geographic Information (tables)
Business Acquisitions (tables)
Severance, Restructuring And Related Charges (tables)
Intangible Assets (tables)
Supplemental Balance Sheet Information (tables)
Significant Accounting Policies (details)
Significant Accounting Policies, Arrangements By Share Based Payment Award (details)
(loss) Earnings Per Share (details)
Long-term Debt (details)
Retirement Benefit Plans (details)
Stockholders' Equity (details)
Stock Incentive Plans (details)
Income Taxes (details)
Income Taxes, Expiration Dates Of Tax Credit Carryforward And Unrecognized Tax Benefit (details)
Related Party Transactions (details)
Lease Obligations (details)
Geographic Information (details)
Commitments And Contingencies (details)
Business Acquisitions, Balance Sheet Disclosure (details)
Business Acquisitions, Income Statement Disclosure (details)
Severance, Restructuring And Related Charges (details)
Intangible Assets (details)
Supplemental Balance Sheet Information(details)


 Please wait while we load the requested 10-K Annual report. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                         https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/form10k.htm




Companies may provide additional information to their SEC Filings as exhibits. Click a link below to view an exhibit that was filed with this report:


                    Exhibit 10.22 - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex10_22.htm



                    Exhibit 10.30 - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex10_30.htm



                    Exhibit 10.31 - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex10_31.htm



                    Exhibit 21 - SUBSIDARIES OF THE REGISTRANT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex21.htm



                    Exhibit 23 - CONSENTS OF EXPERTS AND COUNSEL
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex23.htm



                    Exhibit 31.1 - RULE 13A-14A/15D-14A CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex31_1.htm



                    Exhibit 31.2 - RULE 13A-14A/15D-14A CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex31_2.htm



                    Exhibit 32.1 - SECTION 1350 CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex32_1.htm



                    Exhibit 32.2 - SECTION 1350 CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/54681/000114036116059556/ex32_2.htm






Form Type: Annual
Number of times amended: 0
Accession Number: 0001140361-16-059556
Submitted to the SEC: Wednesday, March 30, 2016
Accepted by the SEC: Wednesday, March 30, 2016
Period Ending: December 2015












Financial Ratios
Intrinsic Value
Financial Stability

















Companies

 Add



KATY





10-K
10-Q




10-K Annual ReportMarch 2016


Sponsored links 




10-K Annual ReportMarch 2015


10-K Annual ReportMarch 2014


10-K Annual ReportApril 2013


10-K Annual ReportMarch 2012


10-K Annual ReportMarch 2011



10-K Annual ReportMarch 2010


10-K Annual ReportMarch 2009


10-K Annual ReportMarch 2008



10-K Annual ReportMarch 2007



 




10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2016


10-Q Quarterly ReportSeptember 2016


10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2016


10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2015


10-Q Quarterly ReportAugust 2015

 


KATY INDUSTRIES INC

	$0.07 +0 (+0%)
	
Stock Exchange:
Over-the-Counter (OTC)

Day's Range:
		N/A 
	
52-Week Range:
	$0.05 to $1.69
Volume:
	N/A
Volume (Avg):
	2,589
Earnings per Share:
	$-1.54
PEG / Short / PE Ratios:
	0.00 / 0.00 / N/A
Market Cap:
	$N/A
Book Value:
	0.00
EBITDA:
	$0.00







Sponsored links 























Katy Industries, Inc. Reports 2015 Second Quarter ResultsHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 4 hrs 30 minsS&P 5002,472.69-4.88 (-0.20%)Dow 3022,017.40+1.16 (+0.01%)Nasdaq6,349.35-13.30 (-0.21%)Stocks to WatchFitbit gets back in shape, Avon CEO to step down, Wyndham to split businessKaty Industries, Inc. Reports 2015 Second Quarter ResultsMarketwiredAugust 10, 2015ReblogShareTweetShareBRIDGETON, MO--(Marketwired - August 10, 2015) - Net Sales Increased 22% over Prior Year Second QuarterCompleted Acquisition of Ohio Manufacturing FacilityAmended Credit Agreement with BMO Harris Bank N.A.Entered into Second Lien Credit Agreement with Victory Park Management, LLCRichard Mark Appointed as Chairman of the Board of DirectorsKaty Industries, Inc. (KATY), a leading manufacturer, importer and distributor of commercial cleaning and consumer storage products, as well as a contract manufacturer of structural foam products, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 26, 2015."We were pleased to announce the acquisition of an Ohio manufacturing facility which brings a breadth of shelving and storage cabinet solutions to the Katy consumer storage product line," said David J. Feldman, Katy Chief Executive Officer. "As a result of the acquisition we amended our credit agreement with BMO Harris Bank N.A. and entered into a second lien credit agreement with Victory Park Management, LLC. In addition, we continued the relocation of our Bridgeton Facility to Jefferson City. We anticipate the acquisition of the Ohio manufacturing facility and the relocation of our primary manufacturing location will drive significant improvement in both sales and profitability for future years."Mr. Feldman continued, "We achieved significant gains in operating income, excluding one-time costs associated with the aforementioned acquisition and relocation costs, with our ongoing strategic initiatives to improve gross margins."Second Quarter Financial ResultsFinancial highlights for the second quarter of 2015, as compared to the same period in the prior year, included:Net sales in the second quarter of 2015 were $31.3 million, an increase of $5.7 million, or 22.4%, compared to the same period in 2014. The increase was a result of increased demand in our Continental business unit and the acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility during the three months ended June 26, 2015 as compared to the three months ended June 27, 2014.Selling, general and administrative expenses were $1.1 million higher in the second quarter of 2015 than in the second quarter of 2014. The increase was primarily due to acquisition costs related to the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility.Severance, restructuring and related charges were $0.5 million for the three months ended June 26, 2015 for costs associated with the relocation of our Bridgeton, Missouri manufacturing facility to Jefferson City, Missouri.Operating income was $0.3 million, or 0.9% of net sales, in the second quarter of 2015, compared to $0.8 million, or 3.1% of net sales, for the same period in 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation and acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, operating income was $1.9 million for the three months ended June 26, 2015 versus operating income of $0.8 million for the three months ended June 27, 2014. Interest expense increased by $1.0 million during the second quarter as a result of the increased borrowings under the First and Second Lien Credit Agreements during the period. Net loss in the second quarter of 2015 was $1.0 million, or $0.12 per basic and diluted share, versus net income of $0.5 million, or $0.07 per basic ($0.02 per diluted) share, in the second quarter of 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation and acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, net income was $0.6 million for the three months ended June 26, 2015 versus net income of $0.5 million for the three months ended June 27, 2014.Year-to-Date Second Quarter Financial ResultsFinancial highlights for the six months ended June 26, 2015, as compared to the six months ended June 27, 2014, included:Net sales for the six months ended June 26, 2015 were $52.7 million, an increase of $7.1 million, or 15.6%, compared to the same period in 2014. The increase was a result of the acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, which contributed $4.9 million in net sales for the six months ended June 26, 2015, and increased demand in our Continental business unit.Selling, general and administrative expenses were $7.6 million for the first half of 2015 as compared to $7.2 million for the first half of 2014. The increase was primarily due to one-time acquisition costs for the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility for the six months ended June 26, 2015, partially offset by one-time acquisition costs for Ft. Wayne Holdings Inc. ("FTW") in the prior year.Severance, restructuring and related charges of $2.1 million for the six months ended June 26, 2015, were for the relocation of our Bridgeton, Missouri facility to Jefferson City, Missouri.Operating loss was $1.4 million, or 2.6% of net sales during the six months ended June 26, 2015, compared to an operating loss of $0.1 million, or 0.3% of net sales, for the same period in 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation and acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, operating income was $1.3 million for the six months ended June 26, 2015 versus an operating loss of $0.1 million for the three months ended June 27, 2014. Interest expense increased by $0.9 million during the six months ended June 26, 2015 as compared to the six months ended June 27, 2014 as a result of the increased borrowings under the First and Second Lien Credit Agreements during the period. The income tax benefit for the six months ended June 27, 2014 includes a benefit as a result of the acquisition of FTW. The Company recorded deferred tax liabilities of $2.4 million which reduced its net deferred tax assets. The reduction in deferred tax assets caused a release of a valuation allowance of $2.3 million.The Company reported a net loss for the six months ended June 26, 2015 of $2.8 million, or $0.35 per basic and diluted share, versus net income of $1.7 million, or $0.21 per basic share ($0.06 per diluted share), for the six months ended June 27, 2014. With the exclusion of one-time items related to our facility relocation and acquisition costs included in selling, general, and administrative expenses in 2015 and the one-time tax benefit and acquisition costs in 2014, net income was $0.6 million for the six months ended June 26, 2015 versus a net loss of $0.6 million for the six months ended June 27, 2014. Liquidity and Capital ResourcesCash used by operating activities before changes in operating assets and liabilities was $0.7 million in the first half of 2015 as compared to cash provided of $0.8 million in the same period of 2014. Changes in operating assets and liabilities from continuing operations provided $1.7 million in the first half of 2015 as compared to using $4.0 million in the same period of 2014. The increase is primarily attributable to increased accounts payable, partially offset by an increase in inventories and accounts receivable.Cash flows used in investing activities of $25.3 million in the first half of 2015 were primarily for the acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility.Debt at June 26, 2015 was $49.7 million, versus $22.0 million at December 31, 2014. On April 7, 2015, in conjunction with the acquisition of the Tiffin, Ohio manufacturing facility, the Company amended the BMO Credit Agreement resulting in an increase of $6.0 million to the revolving credit facility and entered into a Second Lien Credit and Security Agreement with Victory Park Management, LLC which provided the company with a $24.0 million term loan.Non-GAAP Financial Measures This press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Forward-looking statements include all statements of the Company's plans, beliefs or expectations with respect to future events or developments and often may be identified by such words or phrases as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "may," "should," "will," "continue," "is subject to," or similar expressions. These forward-looking statements are based on the opinions and beliefs of Katy's management, as well as assumptions made by, and information currently available to, the Company's management. Additionally, the forward-looking statements are based on Katy's current expectations and projections about future events and trends affecting the financial condition of its business. The forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may lead to results that differ materially from those expressed in any forward-looking statement made by the Company or on its behalf. These risks and uncertainties include, without limitation, conditions in the general economy and in the markets served by the Company, including changes in the demand for its products; success of any restructuring or cost control efforts; an increase in interest rates; competitive factors, such as price pressures and the potential emergence of rival technologies; interruptions of suppliers' operations or other causes affecting availability of component materials or finished goods at reasonable prices; changes in product mix, costs and yields; labor issues at the Company's facilities or those of its suppliers; legal claims or other regulatory actions; and other risks identified from time to time in the Company's filings with the SEC, including its Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014. Katy undertakes no obligation to revise or update such statements to reflect current events or circumstances after the date hereof or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.Katy Industries, Inc. is a diversified corporation focused on the manufacture, import and distribution of commercial cleaning products, consumer home products and a contract manufacturer of structural foam products.      KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. SUMMARY OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS) - UNAUDITED       (In thousands, except per share data)                       Three Months Ended     Six Months Ended         June 26,     June 27,     June 26,     June 27,         2015     2014     2015     2014                                         Net sales   $ 31,344     $ 25,608     $ 52,654     $ 45,534     Cost of goods sold     26,152       21,534       44,257       38,471       Gross profit     5,192       4,074       8,397       7,063     Selling, general and administrative expenses     4,374       3,292       7,626       7,182     Severance, restructuring and related charges     537       -       2,137       -       Operating income (loss)     281       782       (1,366 )     (119 )   Interest expense     (1,291 )     (276 )     (1,500 )     (557 )   Other, net     37       37       65       77     (Loss) income before income tax (expense) benefit     (973 )     543       (2,801 )     (599 )   Income tax (expense) benefit     (7 )     3       (15 )     2,307     Net (loss) income   $ (980 )   $ 546     $ (2,816 )   $ 1,708                                                                             Net (loss) income   $ (980 )   $ 546     $ (2,816 )   $ 1,708     Other comprehensive income                                     Foreign currency translation     (26 )     6       (84 )     (32 )   Total comprehensive (loss) income   $ (1,006 )   $ 552     $ (2,900 )   $ 1,676                                                                             Basic (loss) earnings per share   $ (0.12 )   $ 0.07     $ (0.35 )   $ 0.21     Basic weighted average common shares outstanding:     7,951       7,951       7,951       7,951                                         Diluted (loss) earnings per share   $ (0.12 )   $ 0.02     $ (0.35 )   $ 0.06     Diluted weighted average common shares outstanding:     7,951       26,810       7,951       26,810                                                KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. BALANCE SHEETS - UNAUDITED     (In thousands)                         June 26,     December 31,     Assets   2015     2014     Current assets:                     Cash   $ 48     $ 66       Accounts receivable, net     13,495       10,840       Inventories, net     19,356       15,881       Other current assets     876       659     Total current assets     33,775       27,446                         Other assets:                     Goodwill     14,361       2,556       Intangibles, net     15,472       3,909       Other     4,322       1,839                         Other Assets     34,155       8,304                         Property and equipment     63,553       59,421     Less: accumulated depreciation     (50,402 )     (49,263 )   Property and equipment, net     13,151       10,158                         Total assets   $ 81,081     $ 45,908                                             Liabilities and stockholders' (deficit) equity                   Current liabilities:                     Accounts payable   $ 14,263     $ 7,327       Book overdraft     293       699       Accrued expenses     10,862       8,550       Payable to related party     3,987       3,650       Deferred revenue     186       186       Revolving credit agreement     25,432       21,967     Total current liabilities     55,023       42,379                         Deferred revenue     41       130     Long-term debt     24,227       -     Other liabilities     5,381       4,090     Total liabilities     84,672       46,599                         Stockholders' (deficit) equity:                     Convertible preferred stock     108,256       108,256       Common stock     9,822       9,822       Additional paid-in capital     27,110       27,110       Accumulated other comprehensive loss     (1,628 )     (1,544 )     Accumulated deficit     (125,714 )     (122,898 )     Treasury stock     (21,437 )     (21,437 )   Total stockholders' (deficit) equity     (3,591 )     (691 )                       Total liabilities and stockholders' (deficit) equity   $ 81,081     $ 45,908                                KATY INDUSTRIES, INC. STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS - UNAUDITED     (In thousands)         Six Months Ended         June 26,     June 27,         2015     2014     Cash flows from operating activities:                       Net (loss) income   $ (2,816 )   $ 1,708       Depreciation and amortization of long-lived assets     1,543       1,171       Amortization of debt issuance costs     278       213       Stock-based compensation     63       35       Payment In Kind (PIK) interest expense     227       -       Deferred income taxes     -       (2,318 )           (705 )     809       Changes in operating assets and liabilities:                       Accounts receivable     (1,886 )     (4,031 )       Inventories     (2,049 )     (940 )       Other assets     (349 )     (1,245 )       Accounts payable     4,250       1,812         Accrued expenses     257       338         Payable to related party     337       250         Deferred revenue     (89 )     (90 )       Other     1,215       (66 )         1,686       (3,972 )                         Net cash provided by (used in) continuing operations     981       (3,163 )     Net cash provided by discontinued operations     -       53       Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities     981       (3,110 )                       Cash flows from investing activities:                     Payment for acquisition, net of cash received     (23,855 )     (11,006 )     Capital expenditures     (1,437 )     (373 )     Net cash used in investing activities     (25,292 )     (11,379 )                       Cash flows from financing activities:                     Net borrowings on revolving credit facility     3,465       14,531       Proceeds from term loan facility     24,000       -       Loan from related party     -       400       Decrease in book overdraft     (406 )     64       Direct costs associated with debt facilities     (2,627 )     (672 )     Net cash provided by financing activities     24,432       14,323                         Effect of exchange rate changes on cash     (139 )     (30 )                       Net decrease in cash     (18 )     (196 )   Cash, beginning of period     66       708     Cash, end of period   $ 48     $ 512                         Supplemental information of non-cash investing and financing activity                   Accrued contingent earnout payment   $ 2,000     $ -     Capital expenditures included in accounts payable   $ 526     $ -    ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextTime Warner (TWX) Q2 Earnings Beat Estimates, Revenues MissZacksStart Living The Millionaire LifestyleTorOptionSponsoredSony Music Rides Streaming, Harry Styles Debut for Double-Digit Q1 GainsVarietyTime Warner Quarterly Earnings Get Boost From CNN, ‘Wonder Woman’VarietyTime Warner Beats Q2 Earnings Expectations Helped By ‘Wonder Woman’DeadlineElon Musk says people are canceling Tesla Model 3 orders because it's like a '1.5 hour wait for hamburgers' at a restaurantBusiness Insider63,000 people have canceled their Tesla Model 3 ordersBusiness InsiderTrump told Mexico's president in contentious call to stop publicly saying the country won't pay for the border wallBusiness InsiderToshiba to invest in chip line without JV partner Western DigitalReutersMen and women differ on picking up the tabYahoo Finance VideoStocks struggle after Dow 22k , Tesla soars on beatYahoo Finance'That doesn't just happen!': Trump continues to boast about the stock marketYahoo Finance'Don't put that guy in front of the cameras again': Fox News host unloads on Stephen Miller after altercation with CNN reporterBusiness InsiderFitbit gets back in shape, Avon CEO to step down, Wyndham to split businessYahoo FinanceTeva (TEVA) Q2 Earnings and Sales Miss, Shares UpZacksWhy we’ll see more telco megadeals aheadYahoo Finance VideoTrump, frustrated by Afghan war, suggests firing U.S. commander: officialsPatriautism: Strong words from a five time draft dodger. Why not send your son, Donny?Join the Conversation1 / 56.9k








Katy Industries, Inc. Announces Closing of Disco Sale and a New $20.0 Million Credit AgreementHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreYahooSearchSearchSkip to NavigationSkip to Main ContentSkip to Related Content0Katy Industries, Inc. Announces Closing of Disco Sale and a New $20.0 Million Credit AgreementPR NewswireOctober 11, 2011ReblogShareTweetShareBRIDGETON, Mo., Oct. 11, 2011 /PRNewswire/ -- Katy Industries, Inc. (OTC BB:KATY.ob - News) today announced the successful closing of the sale of the DISCO division ("DISCO") of Continental Commercial Products, LLC ("CCP") to DISCO Acquisition Corp. ("DISCO"), an affiliate of Cellucap Manufacturing Company ("Cellucap"), for $19.0 million. DISCO is a leading manufacturer and distributor of filtration, cleaning and specialty products used in the restaurant and commercial foodservice industry.The transaction will allow CCP to continue to focus on its core business of providing high quality cleaning tools and supplies to the janitorial/sanitary market, while the combination of DISCO and Cellucap will strengthen each company's position in the foodservice disposables market.The proceeds from the DISCO sale were used to pay off the Company's term loan and reduce the Company's outstanding revolving credit balance under its Revolving Credit, Term Loan and Security Agreement with PNC Bank, National Association (the "PNC Facility"). Concurrent with the closing of the DISCO sale, the Company entered into a new $20.0 million Loan and Security Agreement with The PrivateBank and Trust Company, which repaid the remaining revolving credit balance under the PNC Facility."The DISCO sale allows us to become more focused in the marketplace to become an even better supplier to the janitorial/sanitary industry," stated David J. Feldman, Katy's President and Chief Executive Officer. "The sale combined with the elimination of our term loan and reduction of our revolver balance, along with our new banking relationship, allows us to move forward toward our goal of driving our core business to greater revenues and profitability."This press release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  Forward-looking statements include all statements of the Company's plans, beliefs or expectations with respect to future events or developments and often may be identified by such words or phrases as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "may," "should," "will," "continue," "is subject to," or similar expressions.  These forward-looking statements are based on the opinions and beliefs of Katy's management, as well as assumptions made by, and information currently available to, the Company's management.  Additionally, the forward-looking statements are based on Katy's current expectations and projections about future events and trends affecting the financial condition of its business.  The forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may lead to results that differ materially from those expressed in any forward-looking statement made by the Company or on its behalf.  These risks and uncertainties include, without limitation, conditions in the general economy and in the markets served by the Company, including changes in the demand for its products; success of any restructuring or cost control efforts; an increase in interest rates; competitive factors, such as price pressures and the potential emergence of rival technologies; interruptions of suppliers' operations or other causes affecting availability of component materials or finished goods at reasonable prices; changes in product mix, costs and yields; labor issues at the Company's facilities or those of its suppliers; legal claims or other regulator actions; and other risks identified from time to time in the Company's filings with the SEC, including its Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009. Katy undertakes no obligation to revise or update such statements to reflect current events or circumstances after the date hereof or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.Katy Industries, Inc. is a diversified corporation focused on the manufacture, import and distribution of commercial cleaning products and consumer home products.Company contact:Katy Industries, Inc.James W. Shaffer(314) 656-4321ReblogShareTweetSharePopular in the CommunityThe Obamas Send Newlywed Couple a Moving Note of Congratulations7,788 reactions6%67%27%Start Living The Millionaire LifestyleTorOptionSponsoredFire breaks out at world's largest fish market in Tokyo82 reactions3%93%4%Reporter: Here’s the story behind Trump’s dismissing White House as a ‘dump’580 reactions3%64%33%'Big shot' Cubs fan jokingly challenges Chris Christie to MMA fight858 reactions5%60%35%Elephant Parade hits the streets of São Paulo26 reactions5%73%22%Huckabee Sanders takes a dig at Sen. Flake over anti-Trump book282 reactions7%61%32%Luis Fonsi On Justin Bieber's Spanish, 'Despacito' Hitting No. 1570 reactions3%80%17%Trump, frustrated by Afghan war, suggests firing U.S. commander: officials6,921 reactions4%72%24%Violence on ‘Big Brother’: Contestants Forced to Opposite Ends of the House338 reactions4%66%30%Death of Texas woman found buried on Maryland beach ruled accidental941 reactions4%73%23%Training with America's militias84 reactions3%74%23%'The Briefing Room': Legal immigration reform10 reactions11%67%22%Historic Pearl River Mart Reopens to Bring 'Cross-Cultural Joy' to NYC225 reactions8%70%22%Elon Musk says people are canceling Tesla Model 3 orders because it's like a '1.5 hour wait for hamburgers' at a restaurant57 reactions3%73%24%Trump set to embark on 1st vacation since inauguration3,547 reactions4%74%22%Trump, frustrated by Afghan war, suggests firing U.S. commander: officialsPatriautism: Strong words from a five time draft dodger. Why not send your son, Donny?Join the Conversation1 / 56.9k








